Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1007.13
Special receipts allowance; calculation.

The department shall calculate a special receipts allowance for each district equal to the amount of special education, state ward, and accelerated or differentiated curriculum program receipts included in local system formula resources under subdivisions (7), (8), (15), and (16) of section 79-1018.01 attributable to the school district.

Laws 2008, LB988, § 15;

Laws 2016, LB1067, § 36.